Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 2

General Provisions

63-11-201. Levels of practice — Valid license or certificate required.

Four (4) levels of psychological practice are defined for the purposes of this chapter. Such levels are to be known and are referred to as:

Psychological examiner;

Senior psychological examiner;

Psychologist; and

Certified psychological assistant.

Any and all individuals who engage in the practice of psychology as a psychological examiner, senior psychological examiner or psychologist must possess in full force and virtue a valid license under this chapter.

Any person engaged in the practice of psychology as a certified psychological assistant must possess in full force and virtue a valid certificate to practice under this chapter.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a charitable clinic from employing or contracting with a psychologist; provided, that the contractual relationship between the psychologist and the charitable clinic is evidenced by a written contract, job description, or documentation, containing language that does not restrict the psychologist from exercising independent professional judgment in diagnosing and treating patients.

For the purposes of this subsection (d), the term “charitable clinic” means an entity that meets the following standards:

Has received a determination of exemption from the internal revenue service under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) or is a distinct part of an entity that has received such a determination of exemption;

Has clinical facilities located in this state;

Has a primary mission to provide health care or dental care services to low-income, uninsured, or underserved individuals;

Provides one (1) or more of the following services for free or at a discounted rate:

Medical care;

Dental care;

Mental health care; or

Prescription medications;

Utilizes volunteer healthcare professionals and nonclinical volunteers; and

Is not required to be licensed under § 68-11-202(a)(1).

Acts 1953, ch. 169, § 2 (Williams, § 7082.2); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-1105; Acts 2001, ch. 123, § 4; 2016, ch. 766, § 5.

Cross-References. Courses in detection and treatment of child sexual abuse, § 49-7-117.

Licensing, § 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

Occupation tax on psychologists, title 67, ch. 4, part 17.

63-11-202. Practice of psychological examiner — Senior psychological examiners.

A person practices as a psychological examiner within the meaning of this chapter when the person claims to be a psychological examiner and/or renders to individuals or to the public health-related clinical activities or services involving the application of recognized principles, methods and procedures of the science and profession of psychology, such as interviewing or administering and interpreting tests of mental abilities, aptitudes, interests and personality characteristics, for such purposes as psychological evaluation or for educational or vocational selection, guidance or placement. The psychological examiner shall practice the following health-related clinical activities or services only under qualified supervision provided by a psychologist or a senior psychological examiner:

Overall personality appraisal or classification;

Personality counseling;

Psychotherapy;

Behavior analysis; or

Personality readjustment techniques.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as expanding or restricting the scope of practice for a psychological examiner.

Those psychological examiners rendering health-related clinical activities or services who have been duly licensed prior to July 1, 1991, who request to the board in writing or via online application, shall be senior psychological examiners. Those duly licensed psychological examiners rendering health-related clinical activities or services licensed after July 1, 1991, will qualify for senior psychological examiner licensure upon completion of at least five (5) years of applied experience from the date their temporary permit was first issued by the board and upon completion of two hundred (200) hours of post-licensure continuing education units distributed by categories according to the November 1997 rules and regulations governing continuing education units. A person practices as a senior psychological examiner within the meaning of this chapter when the person claims to be a senior psychological examiner and/or renders to individuals or to the public for remuneration any service involving the application of recognized principles, methods and procedures of the science and profession of psychology. A senior psychological examiner, while possessing a different scope of practice than a psychologist, shall be considered a health service provider and thereby able to engage in these designated areas of health-related psychological practice without supervision:

Interviewing or administering and interpreting tests of mental abilities, aptitudes, interests and personality characteristics for such purposes as psychological evaluation or for educational or vocational selection guidance or placement;

Overall personality appraisal or classification, psychological testing, projective testing, evaluations for disability or vocational purposes;

Diagnosis of nervous and mental disorders;

Personality counseling;

Psychotherapy;

Behavior analysis;

Personality readjustment techniques; or

Supervision of a psychological examiner.

Acts 1953, ch. 169, § 2 (Williams, § 7082.2); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-1106; Acts 1999, ch. 500, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 123, § 5; 2003, ch. 21, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 769, §§ 1, 2; 2014, ch. 949, § 10.

63-11-203. Practice of psychologist.

“Practice of psychologist” means the observation, description, evaluation, interpretation and modification of human behavior by the application of psychological principles, methods and procedures for the purpose of assessing, preventing or eliminating symptomatic, maladaptive or undesired behavior and of enhancing interpersonal relationships, work and life adjustment, personal effectiveness, behavioral health and mental health.

“Practice of psychologist” includes, but is not limited to:

Psychological testing and the evaluation or assessment of personal characteristics, such as intelligence, personality, abilities, interests, aptitudes and neuropsychological functioning;

Counseling, psychoanalysis, psychotherapy, hypnosis, biofeedback and behavior analysis and therapy;

Psychological diagnosis and treatment of mental, emotional and nervous disorders or disabilities, alcoholism and substance abuse, disorders of habit or conduct, as well as of the psychological aspects of physical illness, accident, injury or disability;

Case management and utilization review of psychological services;

Psychoeducational evaluation, therapy, remediation and consultation;

Forensic evaluation; provided, that a person licensed under this chapter performing forensic evaluation is considered to be acting within their lawful scope of practice and the practice of forensic evaluation is not exclusive to individuals licensed under this chapter;

Parent coordination; provided, that a person licensed under this chapter performing parent coordination is considered to be acting within their lawful scope of practice and the practice of parent coordination is not exclusive to individuals licensed under this chapter; and

Telepsychology, which means the practice of psychology via electronic communications technology by persons licensed under this chapter.

Psychological services may be rendered to individuals, families, groups and the public.

“Practice of psychologist” is construed within the meaning of this definition without regard to whether payment is received for services rendered.

A person represents that person to be a psychologist if that person uses any title or description of services incorporating the words “psychology,” “psychological” or “psychologist,” if such person possesses expert qualification in any area of psychology or if that person offers to the public or renders to individuals or to groups of individuals services defined as the practice of psychology in this chapter.

Acts 1953, ch. 169, § 2 (Williams, § 7082.2); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-1107; Acts 1992, ch. 991, § 1; 2014, ch. 809, § 1.

63-11-204. Restrictions on methods of treatment.

Nothing in §§ 63-11-201 — 63-11-203 shall be construed as permitting the use of those forms of psychotherapy that involve the administration or prescription of drugs or electroshock or in any way infringing upon the practice of medicine as defined in the laws of this state.

The psychologist, or psychological examiner or senior psychological examiner or certified psychological assistant who engages in psychotherapy must establish and maintain effective intercommunication with a psychologically-oriented physician, usually a psychiatrist, to make provision for the diagnosis and treatment of medical problems by a physician with an unlimited license to practice the healing arts in this state.

A psychologist or, psychological examiner or senior psychological examiner or certified psychological assistant must not attempt to diagnose, prescribe for, treat or advise a client with reference to problems or complaints falling outside the boundaries of psychological practice.

Sections 63-11-203 and 63-11-208(c) and (d) are subject to the limitations of this section.

Acts 1953, ch. 169, § 2 (Williams, § 7082.2); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-1108; Acts 1992, ch. 991, § 25; 2001, ch. 123, §§ 6, 7.

63-11-205. Use of identifying terms.

It is specifically prohibited that any individuals or organizations shall present themselves or be presented to the public by any title incorporating the name “psychological,” “psychologist” or “psychology” other than those licensed as psychologists or, psychological examiners or, senior psychological examiners or certified psychological assistants.

Any psychological scientist employed by a recognized research laboratory, college or university may use the academic or research title conferred upon such psychological scientist by the administration of such laboratory, college or university; and

Persons licensed by the state board of education in areas of school psychology, school psychologist or school psychological services worker and employed as such in the department of education or in any public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school are not required to be licensed under this chapter while performing in the course of their employment. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed so as to apply to persons licensed by the state board of education in areas of school psychology, school psychologist or school psychological services worker who are employed as such in the department of education or in any public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school while performing in the course of their employment.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as permitting such persons to offer their services to any other persons or organizations as consultants or to accept remuneration for any psychological services other than that of their institutional salaries unless they have been licensed or certified under this chapter.

Visiting lecturers from recognized laboratories, colleges or universities are exempt from this section and may utilize their academic or research title when presenting lectures to similar institutions or organizations.

Students of psychology, psychological interns and other persons preparing for the profession of psychological examiner or, senior psychological examiner or, certified psychological assistant or psychologist under qualified supervision in recognized training institutions or facilities may be designated by such titles as “psychological intern,” “psychological trainee” or others clearly indicating such training status.

Psychologists with competency in areas other than the provision of health services shall retain the right to use the title of licensed psychologist with competence in areas other than health services and to practice within their area of competency.

Acts 1953, ch. 169, § 3 (Williams, § 7082.3); 1976, ch. 451, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-1109; Acts 1992, ch. 991, §§ 11, 23, 24; 2001, ch. 123, §§ 8-10.

63-11-206. Unlicensed practice — Penalties — Supervised practice — Evaluation techniques — Temporary licenses — Provisional licenses.

Any person who engages in the practice of psychology and does not then possess in full force and virtue a valid license to practice as psychological examiner or, psychologist or senior psychological examiner or a certificate to practice as a psychological assistant under this chapter and chapter 1 of this title commits a Class B misdemeanor.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent members of other recognized professions that are licensed, certified or regulated under the laws of this state from rendering services consistent with their professional training and code of ethics; provided, that they do not represent themselves to be psychologists or, psychological examiners or, senior psychological examiners or certified psychological assistants. Duly recognized members of the clergy shall not be restricted from functioning in their ministerial capacity; provided, that they do not represent themselves to be psychologists or psychological examiners or senior psychological examiners or certified psychological assistants.

Students of psychology, psychological interns and other persons preparing for the profession of psychological examiner or, psychologist or, senior psychological examiner or certified psychological assistant may perform as a part of their training the functions in §§ 63-11-202 and 63-11-203, but only under qualified supervision.

A person practices as a “certified psychological assistant” within the meaning of this chapter when the person claims to be a certified psychological assistant and/or renders to individuals or to the public for remuneration any service involving the application of recognized principles, methods and procedures of the science and profession of psychology and only under the direct employment and supervision of either the psychologist or senior psychological examiner employing the certified psychological assistant or the employing community mental health center or state governmental agency. Any and all work performed by a certified psychological assistant is supervised by a psychologist or senior psychological examiner as determined by the board.

Use of psychological techniques by governmental institutions and by business and industrial organizations for employment placement, evaluation, promotion or job adjustment of their own officers or employees or by employment agencies for the evaluation of their own clients prior to recommendation for employment is also specifically allowed; however, no industrial or business firm or corporation may sell or offer to the public or to other firms or corporations for remuneration any psychological services as specified in §§ 63-11-202 and 63-11-203, unless such services are performed or supervised by individuals duly and appropriately licensed under this chapter.

A temporary license may be issued by the board for an applicant who has successfully completed the academic course work and training for the license sought and who is scheduled for initial written examination. No temporary permit for a psychological examiner shall be issued for applications received by the board after December 31, 2004.

The temporary license will allow the applicant to perform the functions specified in §§ 63-11-202 and 63-11-203, for which the applicant is seeking licensure under qualified supervision.

In order to receive a temporary license, the applicant must submit a completed application for a temporary license with the applicant's completed application for the desired license, and all appropriate fees, to the board.

A temporary license may be issued by the board for an applicant who has a current license from another state or territory. The temporary license will allow the applicant to perform under qualified supervision the functions specified in §§ 63-11-202 and 63-11-203.

In order to receive a temporary license, the applicant must submit a completed application for a temporary license with the applicant's completed application for the desired license, and all appropriate fees, to the board.

Applications for temporary licenses for applicants currently licensed in another state or territory shall be reviewed and approved or denied by a current member of the board designated by the board to perform this function.

If an applicant is issued a temporary license, the license shall remain valid until the board grants or denies the license application.

However, no person shall be issued more than one (1) temporary license nor shall any temporary license be valid for a period of more than one (1) year.

Such a temporary license may be issued to allow an applicant to perform the functions specified in § 63-11-203 if the applicant has:

Successfully completed an approved American Psychological Association academic course of study;

Previously taken and passed, according to Tennessee standards, the national licensing examination;

A current license in another state or territory in good standing.

Such a temporary license with designation as a health service provider may be issued to an applicant who meets the requirements of subdivision (e)(2)(B) and has:

Successfully completed an American Psychological Association-approved internship; and

Had at least one (1) year of full-time postdoctoral experience delivering health services.

Such a temporary license may be issued to allow an applicant to perform the functions specified in § 63-11-202 if the applicant has:

Previously taken and passed, according to Tennessee standards, the national licensing examination; and

A current license in another state or territory in good standing.

The fee for all temporary licenses shall be set by the board in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100). Until such time as the board establishes a fee by rule, the fee shall be fifty dollars ($50.00).

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to expand or limit in any way the practice of psychological examiners as provided in § 63-11-202 or, senior psychological examiners as provided in § 63-11-202 or certified psychological assistants as provided in subdivision (c)(2) and § 63-11-207(b), nor shall this chapter limit the use of the title “psychological examiner” for persons duly licensed as psychological examiners.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), persons providing services in programs of the department of mental health and substance abuse services or the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities either as employees or through contract agencies are not engaged in the practice of psychology and need not be licensed or certified under this chapter unless they provide services as a psychological examiner or as a psychologist, or as a senior psychological examiner or certified psychological assistant.

A provisional license to practice as a psychologist with the designation as a health service provider may be issued by the board of examiners in psychology to an applicant who has successfully completed the academic and internship requirements of § 63-11-208(c)(3) and (d)(1)(A) and who is to be engaged in a one-year post-doctoral experience required by § 63-11-208(d)(2)(A). Such provisional licensure will allow the applicant to perform the functions specified in §§ 63-11-203 and 63-11-208(d)(2)(B) under the qualified supervision of a psychologist acceptable to the board and who is licensed in Tennessee with a designation as a health service provider in good standing.

In order for a provisional license to remain valid, the licensee must take and pass the examination for professional practice in Tennessee (EPPP) at the level set for licensure as a psychologist in Tennessee within one (1) year of the issuance of the provisional license unless the applicant previously passed the EPPP at that level. A second failure of the EPPP after the issuance of a provisional license shall result in its revocation.

In order for the provisional license to remain valid, the licensee must take and pass the oral and/or jurisprudence examination developed by the board within two (2) years of the issuance of the provisional license. The second failure of the oral and/or jurisprudence examination will result in the revocation of the provisional license.

The board may consider petitions of the licensee regarding extraordinary circumstances that would necessitate delay in taking the written or oral examination.

Acts 1953, ch. 169, § 9 (Williams, § 7082.9); 1955, ch. 56, § 1; 1976, ch. 451, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-1110; Acts 1987, ch. 316, § 1; 1988, ch. 661, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 591, § 112; 1992, ch. 991, §§ 5-9, 22, 26, 27; 1995, ch. 167, §§ 2-4; 1999, ch. 505, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 646, § 1; 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2001, ch. 123, §§ 11-16; 2010, ch. 769, §§ 3, 4; 2010, ch. 1100, § 100; 2012, ch. 575, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

63-11-207. Qualifications and application to practice as examiner — Expiration of period to issue licenses — Certification of psychological assistants.

Any person wishing to obtain the right to practice as a psychological examiner in this state, who has not heretofore been licensed to do so, shall, before it is lawful for such person to practice as a psychological examiner in this state, make application to the board through the chair, upon such form and in such manner as shall be adopted and prescribed by the board.

Unless such a person has obtained a license as prescribed in subdivision (a)(1), it is unlawful for such person to practice; and if such person practices as a psychological examiner without first having obtained such a license, such person has violated this chapter.

A candidate for such license shall furnish the board with satisfactory evidence that such candidate:

Is of good moral character;

Is a citizen of the United States;

Has had two (2) academic years of graduate training in psychology, including a master's degree, from an accredited educational institution recognized by the board as maintaining satisfactory standards, or in lieu thereof, such training and experience as the board shall consider equivalent thereto. The board may, at its discretion, consider equivalent training and experience when presented by qualified applicants with a masters' degree in psychology whose credentials differ slightly than those prescribed in this subdivision (a)(3)(C). In such cases the qualified candidate must petition the board for a waiver and specifically request the board utilize its discretionary authority;

Is competent as a psychological examiner, as shown by passing such examinations, written or oral, or both, as the board deems necessary;

Is not considered by the board to be engaged in unethical practice; and

Has not, within the preceding six (6) months, failed an examination given by the board; provided, that the board may, at its discretion, accept satisfactory substitute training and experience in lieu of that prescribed in subdivision (c)(3).

No new psychological examiner licenses shall be issued for applications received by the board after December 31, 2004.

The discontinued issuance of psychological examiners licenses or the designation of senior psychological examiners shall in no way impair or abridge the right of duly licensed psychological examiners to practice within the scope of their license or to renew their licensure status as required by law.

Any person seeking to practice as a certified psychological assistant in this state shall, before it is lawful for such person to practice as a certified psychological assistant, make application to the board through the chair, upon such form and in such manner as shall be adopted and prescribed by the board, including, but not limited to, the proper registration with the board of the supervisor of record for the certified psychological assistant. Unless such person obtains a proper certificate as issued by the board, it is unlawful for a person to practice; and if such person practices as a certified psychological assistant without first having obtained a proper certificate, such person has violated this chapter.

A candidate for certification shall furnish the board with satisfactory evidence that such candidate:

Is of good moral character;

Is a citizen of the United States;

Is not considered by the board to be engaged in unethical practice; and

Has had two (2) academic years of graduate training in psychology, including a master's degree, from an accredited educational institution recognized by the board as maintaining satisfactory standards, or in lieu thereof, such training and experience as the board shall consider equivalent thereto. Such graduate training must include specialized training in psychological assessment, test construction and measurement, the administration and interpretation of psychological testing, interviewing skills and social history methods. The board may, at its discretion, consider equivalent training and experience when presented by qualified applicants with a master's degree in psychology whose credentials differ slightly than those prescribed in this subdivision (b)(2)(D). However, all applicants must in their graduate training show evidence of supervised practicum experience in the administration and interpretation of psychological testing, assessment procedures and social history and feedback interviewing techniques as determined by the board in order to fulfill educational requirements for certification.

Acts 1953, ch. 169, § 8 (Williams, § 7082.8); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-1111; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 44; 1995, ch. 167, § 5; 1996, ch. 973, § 3; 1996, ch. 980, § 1; 2001, ch. 123, § 17.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

63-11-208. Qualifications and application to practice as psychologist — Specialty certification.

Any person wishing to obtain the right to practice as a psychologist in this state, who has not heretofore been licensed to do so, shall, before it is lawful for such person to practice psychology in this state, make application to the board through the chair upon such form and in such manner as shall be adopted and prescribed by the board.

Unless such a person has obtained a license as prescribed in subsection (a), it is unlawful for such person to practice; and if such person practices psychology without first having obtained such a license, such person has violated this chapter.

A candidate for such license shall furnish the board with satisfactory evidence that such candidate:

Is of good moral character;

Is a citizen or legal resident of the United States;

Has received a doctorate in psychology from an accredited educational institution recognized by the board as maintaining satisfactory standards. After December 31, 1995, all such doctoral programs must be approved by the American Psychological Association, listed by the American Association of State Psychology Boards, or such equivalent standards as are determined by the board;

Is competent in psychology, as shown by passing such examinations, written or oral, or both, as the board deems necessary;

Is not considered by the board to be engaged in unethical practice;

Has not within the preceding six (6) months failed an examination given by the board; and

The board may, at its discretion, consider equivalent training and experience when presented by qualified applicants with a doctoral degree in psychology whose credentials differ slightly than those prescribed in subdivisions (c)(3) and (d)(1)(A). In such cases, the applicant must petition the board for a waiver and specifically request the board utilize its discretionary authority.

Any licensed psychologist who provides or offers health services to the public must be designated by the board as a health service provider. In addition to the requirements for licensure as a psychologist prescribed in subsection (c), an applicant for designation as a health service provider must demonstrate to the board that such applicant:

Has had at least a one-year internship of no less than one thousand nine hundred (1,900) hours in psychology at a site where health services are normally provided and that is part of an organized integrated training program. After December 30, 1995, all such internships must be approved by the American Psychological Association (APA) or listed by the Association of Psychological Post-Doctoral and Internship Centers (APPIC), or such equivalent standards as are determined by the board;

Until December 31, 1999, internships listed in the Directory of Internships for Doctoral Students in School Psychology, published by the Joint Committee on Internships for the Council of Directors of School Psychology Programs, Division 16 of the American Psychological Association and the National Association of School Psychologists, shall be considered to satisfy the internship approval requirement of this subsection (d); and

Has successfully completed at least one (1) year postdoctoral experience delivering health services, supervised by a licensed psychologist designated by the board as a health service provider. If the year of postdoctoral training was not in the state of Tennessee, equivalent supervision must be documented to the satisfaction of the board;

For purposes of this chapter, “health service,” in any variation, means the delivery of direct, preventive, assessment and therapeutic intervention services to individuals whose growth, adjustment or functioning is actually impaired or may be at risk of impairment.

Notwithstanding subsection (d), the board may designate as a health service provider, with practice restriction to recipients in an intellectual disabilities facility under the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities, a person who meets all of the following criteria:

The person holds a doctorate in psychology from a regionally accredited institution;

The person is currently licensed as a psychologist in at least one (1) state;

The person has academic training in intellectual disability and postdoctoral clinical experience in the field of intellectual disability of at least five (5) years' duration;

The department submits to the board a description of the applicant's proposed functioning at the intellectual disability facility;

The department certifies that the applicant has training and experience adequate to perform the applicant's proposed functioning within the department, that the department is unable to recruit otherwise qualified psychologists to provide psychological services and that this inability threatens the integrity of the department's services and the ability of the department to meet the needs of its clients; and

Any psychologist granted designation as a health service provider by the board under this subsection (e) shall surrender this designation upon termination of such person's employment with the department, which designation shall, thereafter, be null and void.

Acts 1953, ch. 169, § 8 (Williams, § 7082.8); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-1112; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 45; 1990, ch. 928, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 18, §§ 1, 2; 1992, ch. 991, § 2; 1996, ch. 973, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2010, ch. 1100, § 101; 2011, ch. 158, § 33.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

63-11-209. Application and examination fees.

Each applicant for a permanent license or certificate shall pay to the board a nonrefundable application fee as set annually by the board.

In addition thereto, each applicant subject to examination under this chapter shall pay an examination fee to the board as set annually by the board.

Each applicant seeking licensure without examination as provided in § 63-11-211 shall, in addition to the application fee provided in this section, pay a fee as set annually by the board.

Acts 1953, ch. 169, § 15 (Williams, § 7082.15); 1955, ch. 56, § 1; 1972, ch. 590, § 1; 1976, ch. 517, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-1113; Acts 1986, ch. 675, § 19; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 27-29; 2001, ch. 123, § 18.

63-11-210. Examination of applicants.

Examination of applicants for a license or certificate to practice psychology shall be made by the board at least once a year according to methods and in such subject fields as may be deemed by the board to be the most practical and expeditious to test the applicant's qualifications.

Such examinations shall include the basic psychological sciences.

The board shall require the examinations to be written or oral, or both; provided, that in any written examination such applicant shall be designated by a number instead of the applicant's name so that the applicant's identity shall not be disclosed to the members of the board until the examination papers have been graded.

The board shall grade the written examinations returned by the candidates and shall keep them for at least one (1) year.

A candidate shall be held to have passed the examination upon the affirmative vote of three (3) or more members of the board.

Any unsuccessful candidate may, upon written request to the board, see the candidate's graded paper.

Acts 1953, ch. 169, § 10 (Williams, § 7082.10); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-1114; Acts 2001, ch. 123, § 19.

63-11-211. Licensure without examination.

The board may, at its discretion, grant a certificate without an assembled examination to any person residing or employed in the state who has not previously failed the appropriate examination given by the board and who, at the time of application, is licensed or certified by a similar board of another state whose standards, in the opinion of the board, are not lower than those required by this chapter, or who has been practicing psychology in another state and has qualifications not lower than those required by this chapter, and is able to satisfy the board that to grant that person a license would be in the public interest, or who has been certified by the American Board of Examiners in Professional Psychology.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), the board shall grant a license without an assembled written or oral examination to any person who at the time of application:

Is licensed or certified in good standing with a similar board of another state;

Has passed the National Examination for the Practice of Professional Psychology at a level greater than or equal to the level required in this state;

Can show reasonable proof that the applicant has available employment in this state by means of letters or other reasonable proof;

Received a psychologist license after January 1, 1995, but before June 1, 1995; and

The board may permit a psychologist licensed in good standing in another state, who meets standards acceptable to the board, to perform the functions of §§ 63-11-203 and 63-11-208(d)(2)(B) and practice as a psychologist in Tennessee without possessing a current license for a period of time, not to exceed twelve (12) days per year, for such purposes as special training or consultation, special evaluation and/or intervention or serving as an expert witness. Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit the regular, repetitive or ongoing provision of psychological services, the supervision of psychological services or the solicitation or advertisement of services to the general public, all of which are governed by the usual and customary processes of licensure for psychologists.

Acts 1953, ch. 169, § 11 (Williams, § 7082.11); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-1115; Acts 1998, ch. 878, § 1; 1999, ch. 505, § 3; 2000, ch. 646, § 2.

63-11-212. Issuing license or certificate — Enforcement of chapter.

The board has authority to administer oaths, to summon witnesses and to take testimony in all matters relating to its duties.

The board shall be the sole agency in this state empowered to certify concerning competence in the practice of psychology to the division and the sole board empowered to recommend licensure or certification for the practice of psychology to the division.

No individual shall be issued a license or certificate for the practice of psychology who has not been previously certified at the appropriate level of practice by the board.

The board shall certify as competent to practice psychology all persons who shall present satisfactory evidence of attainments and qualifications under provisions of this chapter, the rules and regulations of the board and chapter 1 of this title.

Such certification shall be signed by the chair of the board under the board's adopted seal.

It is the duty of the board chair under the direction of the board to aid the solicitors in the enforcement of this chapter and the prosecution of all persons charged with the violation of its provisions.

Acts 1953, ch. 169, § 16 (Williams, § 7082.16); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-1116; Acts 2001, ch. 123, §§ 20, 21.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.